North Carolina, session 2025, HB925.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Chapter 58 of the General Statutes is amended by adding a new Article
to read:
"Article 94.
"Consumers in Crisis Protection Act.
"§ 58-94-1. Short title.
This Article may be cited as the "Consumers in Crisis Protection Act."
"§ 58-94-5. Definitions.
The following definitions apply in this Article:
(1) Affiliate. – As defined in G.S. 53-244.030.
(2) Charges. – Any fees permitted by this Article to be charged to a consumer by
a consumer legal funding company, regardless of how denominated, including
fees denominated as interest or rate.
(3) Commissioner. – The Commissioner of Insurance.
(4) Consumer. – An individual residing in this State.
(5) Consumer legal funding company. – A person that enters into a consumer
legal funding transaction with a consumer, whether or not the person is
registered under this Article.
(6) Consumer legal funding contract. – A contract for a consumer legal funding
transaction.
(7) Consumer legal funding transaction. – A nonrecourse transaction in which a
consumer sells an unvested, contingent future interest in the potential net
proceeds of a settlement or judgment obtained from a legal claim so long as
all of the following apply:
a. The consumer is required to use the funds to address personal needs or
household expenses.
b. The consumer is prohibited from using the funds to pay for attorneys'
fees, legal filings, legal marketing, legal document preparation or
drafting, appeals, expert testimony, or other litigation-related
expenses.
c. The consumer is not required to use the funds in a particular manner,
including to make specific payments or secure specific services.
*H925-v-2*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(8) Funded amount. – The amount of money provided to, or on behalf of, a
consumer pursuant to a consumer legal funding contract. The term excludes
charges.
(9) Gross proceeds. – The total amount of proceeds recovered by a consumer as
a result of a legal claim.
(10) Health care provider. – As defined in G.S. 90-21.50.
(11) Legal claim. – A civil claim or cause of action, filed in a court of law in State
or federal court, including any claim that triggers obligation arising under
G.S. 58-63-15(11) or related regulations.
(12) Net proceeds. – The amount recovered by a consumer as a result of a legal
claim, less the following associated costs and liens:
a. Attorneys' fees and litigation costs associated with the legal claim.
b. Attorney liens, valid health care provider liens, and ERISA contractual
rights of recovery or subrogation liens.
c. Child support, Medicare, tax, or other statutory or governmental liens.
"§ 58-94-10. Relationship with other law.
A consumer legal funding transaction that complies with this Article is not a loan and is not
subject to any provision of law governing loans or investment contracts. To the extent that this
Article conflicts with any other law, this Article supersedes that law for purposes of regulating
consumer legal funding transactions in this State.
"§ 58-94-15. Exemptions.
All of the following are exempt from this Article's requirements:
(1) An immediate family member of the consumer.
(2) A bank, lender, financing entity, or other special purpose entity that either
provides financing to a consumer legal funding company or receives an
interest in a consumer legal funding from a consumer legal funding company.
(3) An attorney or accountant who provides services to a consumer.
"§ 58-94-20. Registration; fee; financial stability.
(a) No person shall enter into a consumer legal funding transaction with a consumer
without first registering as a consumer legal funding company with the Commissioner, in a
format prescribed by the Commissioner, and submitting a registration fee and proof of financial
stability, as required by this Article. A consumer legal funding contract between a consumer and
a consumer legal funding company that has not registered under this Article is void and
unenforceable.
(b) A consumer legal funding company shall pay a nonrefundable fee of one thousand
dollars ($1,000) at the time of registration and at the time of each renewal. Registrations shall be
renewed every three years.
(c) The Commissioner may deny a consumer legal funding company's registration or
renewal of registration for failure to comply with this Article.
"§ 58-94-25. Registration application.
(a) Application. – Applications for registration under this Article shall be filed in a form
determined by the Commissioner. To be considered complete, the application shall be verified
by attestation of the applicant or a designee of the applicant and shall include all of the following:
(1) The applicant's legal name, along with any assumed business name, principal
address, including street address and mailing address, contact information,
and social security number or taxpayer identification number.
(2) The applicant's form and place of organization, if applicable.
(3) A certificate of good standing from the state in which the applicant was
organized, if applicable.
Page 2 House Bill 925-Second Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(4) A certificate of authority from the Secretary of State to conduct business in
this State or other evidence of the applicant's registration or qualification to
do business in this State.
(5) The qualifications and business history of the applicant, including a
description of any injunction or administrative order by any state or federal
authority to which the person is or has been subject for the past 10 years.
(6) A record of any criminal convictions for the applicant, or in the case of an
applicant that is an entity, every officer of the applicant, for a 10-year period
prior to the date of the application, including the applicant's consent to a
federal and State criminal background check and a set of the applicant's
fingerprints in a form acceptable to the Commissioner.
(7) Evidence of its financial stability in the form of certified financial statements
by the chief financial officer, or equivalent, of the applicant that include proof
of a surety bond or irrevocable letter of credit issued and confirmed by a
financial institution authorized by law to transact business in this State for
fifty thousand dollars ($50,000).
(8) Any additional information that the Commissioner deems relevant.
(b) Abandoned Application. – The Commissioner may deem an application abandoned if
the applicant fails to respond to a written request for information by the Commissioner within 30
days of the date of the request.
"§ 58-94-30. Contents of consumer legal funding contract.
(a) Prior to entering into a consumer legal funding transaction in this State, a consumer
legal funding company shall file with the Commissioner a template of a consumer legal funding
contract.
(b) A consumer legal funding contract shall be written using plain language and
understandable to the average consumer who makes a reasonable effort under ordinary
circumstances to read and comprehend the terms of the contract without having to obtain the
assistance of a professional.
(c) All terms of the consumer legal funding contract shall be completed when presented
to the consumer for signature.
(d) Each consumer legal funding contract shall include the following provisions:
(1) Definitions of the terms "consumer," "consumer legal funding company," and
"consumer legal funding transaction," as set forth in this Article.
(2) An acknowledgement that the consumer is represented by an attorney for the
legal claim and has had an opportunity to discuss the contract with the
consumer's attorney.
(3) A right of rescission, allowing the consumer to cancel the contract without
penalty or further obligation if, within 10 business days following the
execution of the contract or the consumer's initial receipt of any portion of the
funded amount, the consumer gives notice of the rescission to the company
and returns all funds provided to the consumer by the company.
(4) Located immediately above the place on the contract where the consumer's
signature is required, the following in 12-point bold font:
"Do not sign this contract before you have read it completely or if it
contains any blank spaces. You are entitled to a completely filled-in copy of
the contract. Before you sign this contract, you should obtain the advice of an
attorney. Depending on the circumstances, you may want to consult a tax,
public or private benefits planning, or financial professional. You
acknowledge that your attorney in the legal claim is not obligated to provide
any tax, public or private benefit planning, or financial advice regarding this
transaction.
House Bill 925-Second Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
You shall not use funds from this transaction to pay attorneys' fees or costs
related to the litigation of your claim."
(5) A requirement that a copy of the executed consumer legal funding contract
shall promptly be delivered to the consumer's attorney upon request.
(6) A statement of the maximum total amount to be assigned by the consumer to
the consumer legal funding company, including the funded amount and all
charges.
(e) Each contract shall include consumer disclosures on the first two pages, to the extent
possible. The consumer disclosures shall be in a form prescribed by the Commissioner and shall
include all of the following:
(1) Notification that some or all of the funded amount may be taxable.
(2) A description of the consumer's right of rescission.
(3) The total funded amount provided to the consumer under the contract.
(4) An itemization of charges.
(5) The total amount due from the consumer, in six-month intervals for 36
months, including all charges.
(6) A statement that no additional charges may accrue 36 months after execution
of the consumer legal funding contract.
(7) A statement that there are no payments owed by the consumer other than what
is disclosed on the disclosure form.
(8) In the event the consumer seeks more than one consumer legal funding
contract, a disclosure providing the cumulative amount due from the consumer
for all transactions, including charges under all contracts, if repayment is made
any time after the contracts are executed.
(9) A statement that the company has no influence over any aspect of the
consumer's legal claim or any settlement or resolution of the consumer's legal
claim and that all decisions related to the consumer's legal claim remain solely
with the consumer and the consumer's attorney.
(10) A statement that if there is no recovery of any money from the consumer's
legal claim, the consumer has no further financial obligation to the company
unless the consumer committed fraud against the consumer legal funding
company.
(11) A statement that, if the net proceeds of the claim are insufficient to repay the
consumer's financial obligation to the company, defined as the complete
funded amount and charges, the consumer is not responsible to the company
for any amount in excess of the net proceeds.
(f) The consumer legal funding contract shall contain a written acknowledgement by the
attorney retained by the consumer for the legal claim that attests to the following:
(1) To the best of the attorney's knowledge, the funded amounts and any charges
relating to the consumer legal funding transaction have been disclosed to the
consumer.
(2) The attorney is being paid pursuant to a separate written fee agreement
between the consumer and the attorney, and the consumer legal funding
company is not a party to that agreement.
(3) Gross proceeds of the legal claim shall be deposited into the client trust
account of the attorney or a settlement fund established to receive the gross
proceeds of the legal claim on behalf of the consumer.
(4) The attorney shall comply with the written irrevocable instructions of the
consumer with regard to the consumer legal funding transaction.
Page 4 House Bill 925-Second Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(5) The attorney is obligated to disburse proceeds from the legal claim and pay
the funded amount and charges due per the terms of the consumer legal
funding contract.
(6) Only liens related to the legal claim, including attorney liens, Medicare,
Veterans Affairs, TriCare, Medicaid, State Employees Health Plan, ERISA
contractual rights of recovery, valid health care provider liens, or other
statutory liens, take priority over any contractual lien of the consumer legal
funding company. All other liens take priority by operation of law.
(7) The attorney for the legal claim is not obligated to provide any tax, public or
private benefit planning, or financial advice regarding the consumer legal
funding transaction.
(g) The failure of the attorney retained by the consumer for the legal claim to provide
written attestation as required by this section renders the contract null and void.
(h) A consumer legal funding contract remains valid and enforceable in the event that,
subsequent to execution, a consumer moves to substitute counsel or pursues a legal claim pro se.
"§ 58-94-35. Nonrecourse obligation; authorized charges.
(a) If a consumer obtains no recovery from the consumer's legal claim, the consumer is
not required to repay a consumer legal funding company unless the consumer committed fraud
against the consumer legal funding company. If the net proceeds of the claim are insufficient to
repay the consumer's financial obligation to the company, defined as the complete funded amount
plus charges authorized by this section, the consumer is not responsible to the company for any
amount in excess of the net proceeds.
(b) The contracted amount to be paid to the consumer legal funding company shall be a
predetermined amount based upon intervals of time from the funding date through the resolution
date and shall not be determined as a percentage of the recovery from the legal claim.
(c) Upon written request from the consumer or the consumer's attorney, the consumer
legal funding company shall reduce charges to a maximum of twenty-five percent (25%) of the
gross proceeds from the legal claim. Any such written request must include an attestation as to
the final amount of the gross proceeds from the legal claim.
(d) No charges shall accrue on a consumer legal funding transaction more than 36 months
after execution of the consumer legal funding contract. A consumer legal funding company,
however, may assess charges on any additional funding, whether by amendment to the consumer
legal funding contract or by execution of a new consumer legal funding contract, for 36 months
after the provision of the additional funding.
"§ 58-94-40. Prohibited acts.
A consumer legal funding company shall not do any of the following:
(1) Pay or offer to pay commissions, referral fees, or any other form of
consideration to any attorney, law firm, health care provider, or an employee
of a law firm or health care provider for referring a consumer to the company.
(2) Accept any commissions, referral fees, or any other form of consideration
from any attorney, law firm, health care provider, or an employee of a law
firm or health care provider.
(3) Refer, in furtherance of the initial legal funding, a consumer or potential
consumer to an attorney, law firm, health care provider, or an employee of a
law firm or health care provider; however, a consumer legal funding company
may direct a consumer or potential consumer to a local or state bar association
referral service or bona fide nonprofit legal aid organization.
(4) Advertise false or misleading information regarding its products or services.
(5) Receive any right to make any decisions with respect to or attempt to influence
a decision relating to the conduct, settlement, or resolution of the consumer's
House Bill 925-Second Edition Page 5

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
legal claim. The right to make these decisions remains solely with the
consumer and the consumer's attorney.
(6) Knowingly pay or offer to pay for case expenses, including court costs, filing
fees, or attorneys' fees, either during or after the resolution of the legal claim.
(7) Fail to promptly provide copies of contract documents to the consumer or the
consumer's attorney upon request.
(8) Provide legal advice to the consumer regarding the consumer legal funding
transaction or the underlying legal claim.
(9) Report a consumer to a credit reporting agency if insufficient funds remain
from the net proceeds to repay the company unless the consumer has
committed fraud against the consumer legal funding company.
(10) Knowingly provide funding to a consumer who has previously assigned or
sold a portion of the consumer's right to proceeds from the consumer's legal
claim without first purchasing a prior unsatisfied consumer legal funding
company's entire funded amount and contracted charges, unless a lesser
amount is otherwise expressly agreed to in writing by the consumer legal
funding companies. Multiple consumer legal funding companies, however,
may agree to contemporaneously provide funding to a consumer so long as
the consumer and the consumer's attorney consent to the agreement in writing.
(11) Collect from a consumer any fees or charges not authorized under this Article.
(12) Sell a contract in whole or in part to a third party. However, if the consumer
legal funding company retains responsibility for collecting payment,
administering, and otherwise enforcing the consumer legal funding contract,
this prohibition does not apply to any of the following:
a. An assignment to a wholly owned subsidiary of the consumer legal
funding company.
b. An assignment to an affiliate of the consumer legal funding company
that is under common control.
c. The granting of a security interest under Article 9 of Chapter 25 of the
General Statutes or as otherwise permitted by law.
(13) Knowingly offering or colluding to provide funding as an inducement to a
consumer who is presently represented by counsel to terminate that
engagement and engage such lawyer or law firm to represent them in the same
matter. Any consumer legal funding contract entered into in violation of this
paragraph shall be void ab initio.
(14) Collude with or knowingly assist a lawyer or law firm that is inducing or
intends to induce a consumer to bring a claim that the company knows or has
reason to know is fabricated or otherwise not brought in good faith. Any
consumer legal funding contract entered into in violation of this subdivision
shall be void ab initio.
(15) Accepting any funds from a foreign government or foreign non-government
person identified as a foreign adversary in 15 C.F.R. § 791.4, including any
agent or entity affiliated with such foreign adversary.
"§ 58-94-45. Attorney prohibitions.
(a) An attorney retained by a consumer for a legal claim, or that attorney's immediate
family member, shall not have a financial interest in the consumer legal funding company
offering consumer legal funding to the consumer. Additionally, any attorney who has referred
the consumer to the consumer's retained attorney shall not have a financial interest in the
consumer legal funding company offering consumer legal funding to the consumer.
(b) An attorney retained by a consumer for a legal claim shall not execute a consumer
legal funding contract on behalf of the consumer.
Page 6 House Bill 925-Second Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(c) A consumer legal funding contract that violates this section is null and void, and no
person has a right to collect, attempt to collect, receive, or retain any funded amount or charges
related to the consumer legal funding.
"§ 58-94-50. Effect of communication on privileges.
Communications between a consumer's attorney and a consumer legal funding company
necessary to ascertain the status of a legal claim or a legal claim's expected value shall not be
discoverable by a party with whom the claim is filed or against whom the claim is asserted. This
section does not limit, waive, or abrogate the scope or nature of any statutory or common-law
privilege, including the work-product doctrine and the attorney-client privilege.
"§ 58-94-55. Disclosure of consumer legal funding transactions.
(a) Within 30 calendar days of receipt of a written request, a consumer shall disclose to
any party to a legal claim whether the consumer has entered into a consumer legal funding
transaction.
(b) If a consumer enters into a consumer legal funding transaction after responding to a
request pursuant to subsection (a) of this section, the consumer shall disclose this fact to the
requesting person within 30 calendar days after the consumer entered into the transaction.
"§ 58-94-60. Discovery and admission of consumer legal funding contracts.
(a) Discovery. – Consumer legal funding contracts are presumed to be discoverable in a
civil action, notwithstanding any agreement or provision with respect to confidentiality. A
consumer may seek to rebut this presumption.
(b) Admission. – Consumer legal funding transactions disclosed pursuant to
G.S. 58-94-55 and consumer legal funding contracts discovered pursuant to subsection (a) of this
section are presumed to be inadmissible as evidence. A party may seek to rebut this presumption.
"§ 58-94-65. Examinations; charges.
For the purpose of protecting consumer interests and determining a consumer legal funding
company's financial stability and compliance with the requirements of this Article, the
Commissioner may conduct an examination of a consumer legal funding company. The company
shall reimburse the Department of Insurance all reasonable costs and expenses of the
examination. In unusual circumstances and in the interests of justice, the Commissioner may
waive reimbursement for the costs and expenses of an examination under this section.
"§ 58-94-70. Rules.
The Commissioner may adopt rules necessary for the proper enforcement of this Article.
Before proposing a rule, the Commissioner shall notify all companies registered or pending
registration under this Article.
"§ 58-94-75. Penalties; enforcement.
(a) After notice and an opportunity for hearing, the Commissioner may do any of the
following if the Commissioner determines that a consumer legal funding company willfully
violated any provision of this Article:
(1) Revoke, suspend, or refuse to renew a consumer legal funding company's
registration.
(2) Order a consumer legal funding company to cease and desist from entering
into additional consumer legal funding transactions.
(3) Assess a civil penalty of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for each
violation. The clear proceeds of any penalty assessed pursuant to this section
shall be remitted to the Civil Penalty and Forfeiture Fund in accordance with
G.S. 115C-457.2.
(4) Order the consumer legal financing company to make restitution to an injured
consumer.
(b) The powers vested in the Commissioner by this Article are in addition to and do not
limit the ability of the Commissioner or any other officer, employee, or agent of the State to take
enforcement action."
House Bill 925-Second Edition Page 7

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 2. If any provision of this act or its application to any person or
circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of this
act that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application and, to this end, the
provisions of this act are severable.
SECTION 3. This act becomes effective October 1, 2025.
Page 8 House Bill 925-Second Edition